Utah statutes.
40-6-9.5.   Permits for crude oil production -- Application -- Bond
requirement -- Closure of facilities -- Availability of records.
(1)  The division may issue permits authorizing construction, operation,
maintenance, and cessation of treating facilities and operations covered by
Subsection 40-6-5(2)(h) and to approve, as part of that permit, post-cessation
reclamation of the site.
(2)  Each owner and operator of any facility described in Subsection
40-6-5(2)(h) or planning to construct, operate, or maintain a facility
described in Subsection 40-6-5(2)(h) shall submit to the division an
application stating in detail the location, type, and capacity of the facility
contemplated; the extent and location of area disturbed or to be disturbed
including, but not limited to, any pits, ponds, or lands, associated with the
facility; a plan for reclamation of the site; and other materials required by
the division.  All existing facilities described in Subsection 40-6-5(2)(h)
shall submit plans by July 28, 1985.  Application for all planned facilities
must be approved and a permit issued before any ground clearing or
construction may occur.
(3)  As a condition for approval of any permit, the owner and operator shall
post a bond in an amount determined by the division to cover reclamation costs
for the site.  Approval of any permit is also conditioned upon compliance with
all laws, rules, and orders of the board.  Failure to post the bond is
considered sufficient grounds to deny a permit.
(4)  The board may order the closure of any facility described in Subsection
40-6-5(2)(h) if an application is not forthcoming in the time allowed in
Subsection (2), a bond is not posted, a violation of the rules and regulations
of other state or federal agencies exists, or for other material and
substantial cause.
(5)  The owner and operator are subject to all applicable state, federal, and
local rules and regulations.
(6)  The records required to be kept by Subsection 40-6-5(2)(i) shall be
available for inspection and audit by the board or its agents during
reasonable working hours.
